District of Columbia statutes.
42-2703.06

Rulemaking.

The Agency shall establish rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 306, 25 DCR 5008
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(m), 46 DCR 1100
1981 Ed., § 45-2126.
1973 Ed., § 45-1913.